Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.17
Factory representative, defined.

Factory representative
means a representative employed by a person who manufactures or assembles
motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers, or by a factory branch, for the
purpose of promoting the sale of its motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers
to, or for supervising or contacting, its dealers or prospective dealers in
this state.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 29.